Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 3. Department of Wildlife Resources.

§ 29.1-109.
Department of Wildlife Resources; Director.

The Department shall exist to provide public, informational and educational services related to this title, and to serve as the agency responsible for the administration and enforcement of all rules and regulations of the Board, the statutory provisions of this title, and related legislative acts. The Department shall employ scientific principles and procedures, as developed, researched, recognized and accepted within the bounds of comprehensive professional wildlife resource management, in the management of the Commonwealth’s wildlife and natural resources.

The Board shall appoint a Director, subject to confirmation and reconfirmation every four years by the General Assembly, to head the Department and to act as principal administrative officer. In addition to the powers designated elsewhere in this title, the Director shall have the power to:

Enforce or cause to be enforced all laws for the protection, propagation and preservation of game birds and game animals of the Commonwealth and all fish in the inland waters thereof. Inland waters shall include all waters above tidewater and the brackish and freshwater streams, creeks, bays, including Back Bay, inlets, and ponds in the tidewater counties and cities. In waters of the Albemarle and Currituck watersheds, the management of the recreational and commercial harvest of blue crabs shall rest with the Marine Resources Commission.

Initiate prosecution of all persons who violate such laws, and seize and confiscate wild birds, wild animals and fish that have been illegally killed, caught, transported or shipped.

Enter into reciprocal or mutual aid agreements with other states pertaining to the enforcement of laws set forth in Chapters 3 (§

29.1-300

et seq.), 4 (§

29.1-400

et seq.), 5 (§

29.1-500

et seq.), and 6 (§

29.1-600

et seq.) across state boundaries.

Employ persons necessary for the administrative requirements of the Board and to designate the official position and duties of each. The salaries of all such employees shall be as provided in accordance with law.

Perform such acts as may be necessary to the conduct and establishment of cooperative fish and wildlife projects with the federal government as prescribed by acts of Congress and in compliance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Interior.

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of his duties and the execution of his powers, including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, other state agencies and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

When practicable, consult with, and keep informed, wildlife and boating constituent organizations so as to benefit Virginia’s wildlife and natural resources and accomplish the Department’s mission.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 29-8, 29-16; 1952, c. 680, § 29-1.1; 1954, c. 632, § 29-15; 1962, c. 469, § 29-14; 1974, c. 59, § 29-2; 1979, c. 264, § 29-13; 1987, c. 488; 1999, c. 215; 2000, c. 10; 2006, cc. 69, 915; 2012, c. 595; 2015, c. 68; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 595, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Marine Resources Commission pertaining to marine and brackish fish that are not currently regulated by the Board of Game and Inland Fisheries in the waters of the Albemarle and Currituck watersheds shall remain in full force and effect in those watersheds until regulations adopted by the Board of Game and Inland Fisheries pertaining to those species become effective.”

Acts 2014, c. 429, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall work cooperatively, and with federal, state, and local agencies, as may be advisable, to provide information and promote programs that are available to landowners, livestock producers, and other individuals who are seeking assistance with coyote control concerns.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Department of Wildlife Resources” was substituted for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries”’ in the Article 3 heading to conform with Acts 2020, c. 958.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 10 added subdivision B 6.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 69 and 915 are identical, and inserted “subject to confirmation and reconfirmation every four years by the General Assembly” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 595 added the third sentence of subdivision B 3.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 68 added subdivision B 3 and redesignated former subdivisions B 3 through B 6 as subdivisions B 4 through B 7.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” following “Department” in subsection A, first sentence.

§ 29.1-110.
Disbursements, accounts for Department; Board.

The disbursements of the Department and the Board shall be limited to the amount appropriated by the General Assembly from the game protection fund to expenditures from the Lifetime Hunting and Fishing Endowment Fund. In no event shall the Commonwealth pay obligations that may be incurred by the Department or Board or be liable in any manner for such obligations except to the extent of the game protection fund and the Lifetime Hunting and Fishing Endowment Fund.

Accounts for salaries, allowances, wages and expenses authorized by the Board shall be certified to the Comptroller for payment as the Board may direct by resolution.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 29-21, 29-22; 1956, c. 337; 1987, cc. 95, 488.

Editor’s note.

Pursuant to § 30-152, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1987, c. 95, which amended former § 29-21, the comparable provision in former Title 29.

§ 29.1-111.
Sale of timber; portion of proceeds to be paid to locality.

The Director is authorized to manage and harvest timber on lands owned by the Board in accordance with the best timber and game management practices, and to sell the timber. Proceeds from the sale of such timber shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the game protection fund.

When the Director authorizes the selling of timber which is standing, or which has been cut from timber standing on land owned by the Board, the Board shall pay to the locality in which the standing timber is located twenty-five percent of the proceeds of the sale of the timber, after deducting the cost of any road constructed by the Department which is necessary for the sale of the timber.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-23; 1964, c. 532, § 29-23.01; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-112.
Payment of license and permit fees.

The Director may authorize the acceptance of any method of payment authorized by §

2.2-614.1

in lieu of money for payment of any fees collected by the Department or agents acting on behalf of the Department for any licenses or permits issued under this title or for any merchandise sold by the Department.

History.

1999, c. 254; 2002, c. 719.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 231, cl. 1, effective March 13, 2012, provides: “§ 1. The Department of Game and Inland Fisheries shall waive the facility use permit fee for any person who is engaged in land-based recreational activity at Rural Retreat Lake Park in Wythe County.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 719 deleted “by credit card” from the catchline; substituted “any method of payment authorized by §

2.2-614.1

” for “credit cards,” and deleted the last two sentences, regarding the addition of a service charge to payments made by credit card.

§ 29.1-113.
Admittance, parking, and use at certain Department-owned facilities or Department-leased land; civil penalty.

No person shall make use of, gain admittance to, or attempt to use or gain admittance to certain Department-owned facilities where the Department charges a fee established by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

, unless the person pays such fee. However, such fee shall not apply to (i) any person holding a valid hunting, trapping, or fishing permit or current certificate of boat registration issued by the Department; (ii) any person 16 years of age or younger; or (iii) the use of Department-owned boat ramps.

No person shall hunt on private lands managed by the Department through a lease agreement or other similar memorandum of agreement where the Department issues an annual hunting stamp without having purchased a valid annual hunting stamp.

Any person violating subsection A or B may, in lieu of any criminal penalty, be assessed a civil penalty of up to $50 by the Department. Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the Game Protection Fund established pursuant to §

29.1-101

.

No owner or driver shall cause or permit a vehicle to stand:

On property owned or managed by the Department outside of a designated parking space, except for a reasonable time in order to receive or discharge passengers or in the case of an emergency;

In any designated parking space on property owned or managed by the Department in violation of any posted rule regarding use of the space; or

In any space on property owned or managed by the Department designated for use by persons with disabilities unless the vehicle displays a license plate or decal issued by the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles, or a similar identification issued by a similar authority of another state or the District of Columbia, that authorizes parking in such a designated space. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

29.1-554

, any regulation of the Board, or any other trespass provision in the Code of Virginia, no person violating this subsection shall be subject to a criminal penalty. Any person violating this subsection may, in lieu of any criminal penalty, be assessed a civil penalty of $25, which shall be paid into the Game Protection Fund.

History.

2003, c. 562; 2004, c. 280; 2011, c. 768; 2020, c. 321; 2022, cc. 33, 34.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 382, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

29.1-113

of the Code of Virginia, access fees at boat ramps owned or managed by the Department of Wildlife Resources (DWR) shall not be assessed prior to July 1, 2022, pending a study by DWR on the costs and benefits of such fees and the impact on recreational users in Virginia. As part of this study, the Department shall convene a stakeholder group for the purpose of developing and providing recommendations on access permit fees, various alternatives, and other issues related to the use and maintenance of Department-owned boat ramp facilities. The stakeholder work group shall be composed of representatives of registered boat owners, paddlecraft liveries, outdoor outfitters, environmental education providers, and other non-registered vessel recreational users of such boat ramps, or other affected parties the Department deems necessary. The work group shall consider mechanisms that will decrease the burden on outfitters, customers, education providers, and non-profit organizations; the usage of access fees to maintain or improve existing boat ramps and to add new boat ramps, paddlecraft launches, and public access points on Department-owned property; and alternative funding mechanisms and strategies that can increase access by economically disadvantaged users. DWR shall submit a report on the work group’s recommendations to the Governor, the Secretary of Natural Resources, the House Agricultural, Chesapeake and Natural Resources Committee, the Senate Agricultural, Conservation and Natural Resources Committee, the House Appropriations Committee and the Senate Finance and Appropriations Committee by December 1, 2021.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 280 inserted subsection B; and redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 768 rewrote subsection C, which read: “Any person violating this section may, in lieu of any criminal penalty, be assessed a civil penalty of up to $50 by the Department. Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the Game Protection Fund.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 321, in subsection A, substituted “any Department-owned or Department-managed facility or boat ramp” for “those certain Department-owned facilities,” inserted “an access permit or” in clause (i), and rewrote clause (iii), which formerly read “the use of Department-owned boat ramps”; added “established pursuant to §

29.1-101

” in subsection C; added the subsection D designation; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 33 and 34 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “certain Department-owned facilities” for “any Department-owned or Department-managed facility or boat ramp,” deleted “or an access permit” following “fishing permit” in clause (i), and substituted “the use of Department-owned boat ramps” for “any person who is a passenger in but not the owner or operator of a paddlecraft or registered vessel” in clause (iii).

§ 29.1-114.
Hunting from aircraft feral hogs.

Notwithstanding § 5.1-17, employees of the Department and employees of federal agencies whose responsibilities include fisheries and wildlife management, in the performance of such employees’ official duties, may hunt or kill feral hogs in False Cape State Park and Back Bay National Wildlife Refuge from aircraft, with the permission of the landowner. However, no such activity shall occur during waterfowl season.

History.

2016, c. 116; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 116 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” following “Department” in the first sentence.